Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska20-310
Dwelling, defined.

Dwelling shall mean any building, structure, or portion thereof which is occupied as or designed or intended for occupancy as a residence for one or more families and any vacant land which is offered for sale or lease for the construction or location thereon of any such building, structure, or portion thereof.

Laws 1969, c. 120, § 2, p. 539;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 20-106;

Laws 1991, LB 825, § 11.